District of Columbia statutes.
2-1604

Director and Deputy Director; appointment; duties; membership in bar required.

The Board of Trustees shall appoint a Director and Deputy Director of the Service, each of whom shall serve at the pleasure of the Board. The Director shall be responsible for the supervision of the work of the Service and shall perform such other duties as the Board of Trustees may prescribe. The Deputy Director shall assist the Director and shall perform such duties as he may prescribe. The Director and Deputy Director shall be members of the bar of the District of Columbia.

History

July 29, 1970, 84 Stat. 656, Pub. L. 91-358, title III, § 304
Mar. 3, 1979, D.C. Law 2-139, § 3205(cc), 25 DCR 5740
Aug. 5, 1997, 111 Stat. 762, Pub. L. 105-33, § 11272(b)
Oct. 21, 1998, 112 Stat. 2427, Pub. L. 105-274, § 7(d)

Cross References

Effective date of this section, see § 1-63

Section References

This section is referenced in § 1-636.02.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 1-2704.
1973 Ed., § 2-2224.

Editor's Notes

Section 11272 of Pub. L. 105-33: Section 7(d) of Pub. L. 105-274 provided that § 11272 of Pub. L. 105-33, which rewrote this section, is repealed, effective October 21, 1998. This section is set out above as it appeared prior to the enactment of § 11272.